Massachusetts, session 194th, H4547.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The City of Salem may impose an excise at the rate of $2.00 per registered 
parking space offered by an operator registered with the city who transfers the right to use a 
parking space in return for consideration during the period beginning on the Friday preceding 
October 1 and ending on the first Monday after October 31. After the adoption of this Act, but no 
sooner than January 1, 2027, and effective each January first thereafter, the rate shall increase by 
twenty-five cents.  
A parking place shall include any place within the city at which vehicles are parked or 
stored during the aforementioned period in return for a consideration, not including any parking 
place operated by the United States, Commonwealth of Massachusetts or an instrumentality 
thereof, or to the extent that it is provided or leased to residents of the same or other premises, 
provided that the parking or storage of a vehicle by such resident is for use only in connection 
with, and as accessory to, the occupancy of a dwelling unit in the City.  

of 2 13  Every operator who has made any transfer of the right to use any parking space on which 
an excise is payable shall pay the excise tax imposed no later than November 30 of each calendar 
year to the City Collector.  
Any excise tax collected pursuant to this Act shall be deposited into a designated account, 
the Transportation Enhancement Fund, for funding alternative transportation within the City of 
Salem including, but not limited to, ride share programs and bicycle rentals.  
The City of Salem shall adopt an ordinance or regulation to administer the excise tax on 
parking places within the City.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.